District of Columbia statutes.
42-2402

Applicability.

This chapter applies only to transactions involving purchase money loans made by lenders that are secured by first or second deeds of trust or mortgages, excluding second deeds of trust or mortgages for refinancing purposes only, on real estate containing not more than 4 residential dwelling units.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-187, § 3, 33 DCR 7681

History

1981 Ed., § 45-2802.

Prior Codifications